Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB310.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1617. Free Application for Federal Student Aid.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, prior to completing high school, a student who attends a school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL in this Commonwealth, unless exempted under subsection (e), shall file a FAFSA with the United States Department of Education or submit an opt-out form in accordance with subsection (b).(b) The parent or legal guardian of a student or, if a <--12345678910111213141516171819 student is at least eighteen years of age or legally emancipated, the student may opt out of filing the FAFSA under subsection (a) by completing and submitting to the school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL an opt-out form developed by the department, in consultation with the agency. The opt-out form shall include a statement that the parent, legal guardian or student, as applicable, understands the purpose of the FAFSA and has chosen not to file the application.(c) The department shall make the opt-out form available to school entities , NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS AND PRIVATE SCHOOLS and post the opt-out form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) A school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL shall provide a copy of the opt-out form to parents, legal guardians and students.(e) If a FAFSA is not filed or opt-out form is not submitted on behalf of a student, the school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL may exempt the student from the provisions of subsection (a). Prior to making an exemption, the school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL must make a reasonable effort to contact the parent or legal guardian of the student.(f) The agency shall provide a school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL with information indicating whether a student of the school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL has completed the FAFSA . , PROVIDED THE AGENCY HAS ACCESS TO THE INFORMATION.(g) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require a parent, legal guardian or student to provide personal financial information to a school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL . 20250SB0310PN0753 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Personal financial information inadvertently obtained from a parent, legal guardian or student by a school entity , NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR PRIVATE SCHOOL as a result of administering this section is not a public record accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency" shall mean the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."FAFSA" shall mean the Free Application for Federal Student Aid."NONPUBLIC SCHOOL" SHALL MEAN A NONPROFIT SCHOOL, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC SCHOOL WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, IN WHICH A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY LEGALLY FULFILL THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT AND THAT MEETS THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 ET SEQ.)."PRIVATE SCHOOL" SHALL MEAN A PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOL AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF JANUARY 28, 1988 (P.L.24, NO.11), KNOWN AS THE PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOLS ACT."School entity" shall mean an area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, nonpublic school, private school, regional charter school or school district. Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0310PN0753 - 3 - <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728